North Dakota, session 69, HB1299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 29-06-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
29-06-22. When a private person may break into a building.
A private person, in order to make an arrest when a felony was committed in the arresting person's
presence, as authorized in section 29-06-20, if the person is refused admittance after the person has
announced the person's purpose and the person reasonably believes an individual inside is at imminent
risk of serious bodily injury or death, may break open a door or window of any building in which the
person to be arrested is, or is reasonably believed to be.

H. B. NO. 1299 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1299.
House Vote: Yeas 82 Nays 11 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State